apertium-fao.fao.dix
    <pardef n="ok__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>um</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ið</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ið</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inum</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sins</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ini</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ini</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unum</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anna</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fj/all__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>all</l>
          <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>all</l>
          <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alli</l>
          <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>als</l>
          <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øll</l>
          <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øll</l>
          <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øllum</l>
          <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>alla</l>
          <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>allið</l>
          <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>allið</l>
          <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>allinum</l>
          <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>allsins</l>
          <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øllini</l>
          <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øllini</l>
          <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>øllunum</l>
          <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>allanna</l>
          <r>all<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vet/ur__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ur</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ur</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ri</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rar</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rar</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rar</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rum</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urin</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>urin</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rinum</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rarins</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rarnir</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rarnar</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>runum</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ranna</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="róp"><i>róp</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="segl"><i>segl</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="mark"><i>mark</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="villdýr"><i>villdýr</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="pappír"><i>pappír</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="likam"><i>likam</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="hár"><i>hár</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="avkom"><i>avkom</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="torg"><i>torg</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="vetur"><i>vet</i><par n="vet/ur__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="horn"><i>horn</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="djúp"><i>djúp</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="summar"><i>summar</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="svar"><i>svar</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="sund"><i>sund</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="lið"><i>lið</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="net"><i>net</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="tár"><i>tár</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="verð"><i>verð</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="heyst"><i>heyst</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ok"><i>ok</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="brúdleyp"><i>brúdleyp</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="fjall"><i>fj</i><par n="fj/all__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="bróst"><i>bróst</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="svørð"><i>svørð</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="træ"><i>træ</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="vár"><i>vár</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="frukttræ"><i>frukttræ</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="skordýr"><i>skordýr</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="svín"><i>svín</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kyn"><i>kyn</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="lík"><i>lík</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="lív"><i>lív</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="træl"><i>træl</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="bræv"><i>bræv</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="støð"><i>støð</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="skriðdýr"><i>skriðdýr</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="knæ"><i>knæ</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="regn"><i>regn</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kurv"><i>kurv</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="rándýr"><i>rándýr</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="høvur"><i>høvur</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="tekn"><i>tekn</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
